Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 14.8 Uniform Debt-Management Services Act

19-14.8-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Debt-Management Services Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-2.
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Director” means the director of the department of business regulation.

“Affiliate”:

With respect to an individual, means:

The spouse of the individual;

A sibling of the individual or the spouse of a sibling;

An individual or the spouse of an individual who is a lineal ancestor or lineal descendant of the individual or the individual’s spouse;

An aunt, uncle, great aunt, great uncle, first cousin, niece, nephew, grandniece, or grandnephew, whether related by the whole or the half blood or adoption, or the spouse of any of them; or

Any other individual occupying the residence of the individual; and

With respect to an entity, means:

A person who directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the entity;

An officer of, or an individual performing similar functions with respect to, the entity;

A director of, or an individual performing similar functions with respect to, the entity;

Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to this chapter, a person who receives or received more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) from the entity in either the current year or the preceding year or a person who owns more than ten percent (10%) of, or an individual who is employed by or is a director of, a person who receives or received more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) from the entity in either the current year or the preceding year;

An officer or director of, or an individual performing similar functions with respect to, a person described in subsection (b)(i) above;

The spouse of, or an individual occupying the residence of, an individual described in subsections (b)(i) — (b)(v); or

An individual who has the relationship specified in subsection (a)(iv) to an individual or the spouse of an individual described in subsections (b)(i) — (b)(v).

“Agreement” means an agreement between a provider and an individual for the performance of debt-management services.

“Bank” means a financial institution, including a commercial bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, and trust company, engaged in the business of banking, chartered under federal or state law, and regulated by a federal or state banking regulatory authority.

“Business address” means the physical location of a business, including the name and number of a street.

“Certified counselor” means an individual certified by a training program or certifying organization, approved by the director, that authenticates the competence of individuals providing education and assistance to other individuals in connection with debt-management services.

“Concessions” means assent to repayment of a debt on terms more favorable to an individual than the terms of the contract between the individual and a creditor.

“Day” means calendar day.

“Debt-management services” means services as an intermediary between an individual and one or more creditors of the individual for the purpose of obtaining concessions, but does not include:

Legal services provided in an attorney-client relationship by an attorney licensed or otherwise authorized to practice law in this state;

Accounting services provided in an accountant-client relationship by a certified public accountant licensed to provide accounting services in this state; or

Financial-planning services provided in a financial planner-client relationship by a member of a financial-planning profession whose members the director, by rule, determines are:

Licensed by this state;

Subject to a disciplinary mechanism;

Subject to a code of professional responsibility; and

Subject to a continuing-education requirement.

“Entity” means a person other than an individual.

“Good faith” means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable standards of fair dealing.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, or any other legal or commercial entity. The term does not include a public corporation, government, or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

“Plan” means a program or strategy in which a provider furnishes debt-management services to an individual and that includes a schedule of payments to be made by or on behalf of the individual and used to pay debts owed by the individual.

“Principal amount of the debt” means the amount of a debt at the time of an agreement.

“Provider” means a person that provides, offers to provide, or agrees to provide debt-management services directly or through others.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Settlement fee” means a charge imposed on or paid by an individual in connection with a creditor’s assent to accept in full satisfaction of a debt an amount less than the principal amount of the debt.

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic sound, symbol, or process.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Trust account” means an account held by a provider that is:

Established in an insured bank;

Separate from other accounts of the provider or its designee;

Designated as a trust account or other account designated to indicate that the money in the account is not the money of the provider or its designee; and

Used to hold money of one or more individuals for disbursement to creditors of the individuals.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-3.
Exempt agreements and person.

This chapter does not apply to an agreement with an individual who the provider has no reason to know resides in this state at the time of the agreement.

This chapter does not apply to a provider to the extent that the provider:

Provides or agrees to provide debt-management, educational, or counseling services to an individual who the provider has no reason to know resides in this state at the time the provider agrees to provide the services; or

Receives no compensation for debt-management services from or on behalf of the individuals to whom it provides the services or from their creditors.

This chapter does not apply to the following persons or their employees when the person or the employee is engaged in the regular course of the person’s business or profession:

A judicial officer, a person acting under an order of a court or an administrative agency, or an assignee for the benefit of creditors;

A bank chartered under the laws of the United States or of this state;

An affiliate, as defined in §

19-14.8-2(2)(b)(i)

, of a bank described in subsection (2) if the affiliate is regulated by a federal or state banking regulatory authority;

A title insurer, escrow company, or other person that provides bill-paying services if the provision of debt-management services is incidental to the bill-paying services;

A bank chartered under the laws of another state, so long as the laws of such other state expressly authorize such bank to operate in such state, under conditions no more restrictive than those imposed by the laws of this state, as determined by the director, or the director’s designee; or

An affiliate, as defined in §

19-14.8-2(2)(b)(i)

, of a bank described in subsection (5) if the affiliate is regulated by a federal or state banking regulatory authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-4.
Registration required.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a provider may not provide debt-management services to an individual who it reasonably should know resides in this state at the time it agrees to provide the services, unless the provider is registered under this chapter.

If a provider is registered under this chapter, subsection (a) does not apply to an employee or agent of the provider.

The director shall maintain and publicize a list of the names of all registered providers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-5.
Application for registration — Form, fee and accompanying documents.

An application for registration as a provider must be in a form prescribed by the director.

Subject to adjustment of dollar amounts pursuant to §

19-14.8-32(f)

, an application for registration as a provider must be accompanied by:

The fee established by chapter 14 of this title;

The bond required by §

19-14.8-13

;

Identification of all trust accounts required by §

19-14.8-22

and an irrevocable consent authorizing the director to review and examine the trust accounts;

Evidence of insurance in the amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000):

Against the risks of dishonesty, fraud, theft, and other misconduct on the part of the applicant or a director, employee, or agent of the applicant;

Issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state and rated at least “A” by a nationally recognized rating organization;

With a deductible of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

Payable to the applicant, the individuals who have agreements with the applicant, and this state, as their interests may appear; and

Not subject to cancellation by the applicant without the approval of the director;

If the applicant is a foreign corporation, proof that the applicant holds a certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state, as required by chapter 6 of title 7; and

If the applicant is organized as a not-for-profit entity or is exempt from taxation, evidence of not-for-profit and tax-exempt status applicable to the applicant under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501, as amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 106, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 125, § 4.

19-14.8-6.
Application for registration — Required information.

An application for registration must be signed under oath or certified under the penalties of perjury and include:

The applicant’s name, principal business address and telephone number, and all other business addresses in this state, electronic-mail addresses, and internet website addresses;

All names under which the applicant conducts business;

The address of each location in this state at which the applicant will provide debt-management services or a statement that the applicant will have no such location;

The name and home address of each officer and director of the applicant and each person that owns at least ten percent (10%) of the applicant;

Identification of every jurisdiction in which, during the five (5) years immediately preceding the application:

The applicant or any of its officers or directors has been licensed or registered to provide debt-management services; or

Individuals have resided when they received debt-management services from the applicant;

A statement describing, to the extent it is known or should be known by the applicant, any material civil or criminal judgment or litigation and any material administrative or enforcement action by a governmental agency in any jurisdiction against the applicant, any of its officers, directors, owners, or agents, or any person who is authorized to have access to the trust account required by §

19-14.8-22

;

The applicant’s financial statements, audited by an accountant licensed to conduct audits, for each of the two (2) years immediately preceding the application or, if it has not been in operation for the two (2) years preceding the application, for the period of its existence;

Evidence of accreditation by an independent accrediting organization approved by the director;

Evidence that, within twelve (12) months after initial employment, each of the applicant’s counselors becomes certified as a certified counselor;

A description of the three (3) most commonly used educational programs that the applicant provides or intends to provide to individuals who reside in this state and a copy of any materials used or to be used in those programs;

A description of the applicant’s financial analysis and initial budget plan, including any form or electronic model, used to evaluate the financial condition of individuals;

A copy of each form of agreement that the applicant will use with individuals who reside in this state;

The schedule of fees and charges that the applicant will use with individuals who reside in this state;

At the applicant’s expense, the results of a criminal-records check, including fingerprints, conducted within the immediately preceding twelve (12) months, covering every officer of the applicant and every employee or agent of the applicant who is authorized to have access to the trust account required by §

19-14.8-22

;

The names and addresses of all employers of each director during the ten (10) years immediately preceding the application;

A description of any ownership interest of at least ten percent (10%) by a director, owner, or employee of the applicant in:

Any affiliate of the applicant; or

Any entity that provides products or services to the applicant or any individual relating to the applicant’s debt-management services;

A statement of the amount of compensation of the applicant’s five (5) most highly compensated employees for each of the three (3) years immediately preceding the application or, if it has not been in operation for the three (3) years preceding the application, for the period of its existence;

The identity of each director who is an affiliate, as defined in §

19-14.8-2(2)(a)

or (b)(i), (b)(ii), (b)(iv), (b)(v), (b)(vi), or (b)(vii), of the applicant; and

Any other information that the director reasonably requires to perform the director’s duties hereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-7.
Application for registration — Obligation to update.

An applicant or registered provider shall notify the director within ten (10) days after a change in the information specified in §

19-14.8-5(b)(4)

or (6) or §

19-14.8-6(1)

, (3), (6), (12), or (13).

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-8.
Application for registration — Public information.

Except for the information required by §

19-14.8-6(7)

, (14), and (17) and the addresses required by §

19-14.8-6(4)

, the director shall make the information in an application for registration as a provider available to the public.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-9.
Certificate of registration — Issuance or denial.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c), the director shall issue a certificate of registration as a provider to a person that complies with §§

19-14.8-5

and

19-14.8-6

.

The director may deny registration if:

The application contains information that is materially erroneous or incomplete;

An officer, director, or owner of the applicant has been convicted of a crime, or suffered a civil judgment, involving dishonesty or the violation of state or federal securities laws;

The applicant, or any of its officers, directors, or owners, has defaulted in the payment of money collected for others; or

The director finds that the financial responsibility, experience, character, or general fitness of the applicant, or its owners, directors, employees, or agents, does not warrant belief that the business will be operated in compliance with this chapter.

The director shall deny registration if:

The application is not accompanied by the fee established by the director; or

With respect to an applicant that is organized as a not-for-profit entity or has obtained tax-exempt status under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501, the applicant’s board of directors is not independent of the applicant’s employees and agents.

Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to §

19-14.8-32(f)

, a board of directors is not independent for purposes of subsection (c) of this section if more than one-fourth (1/4) of its members:

Are affiliates of the applicant, as defined in §

19-14.8-2(2)(a)

or (2)(b)(i), (ii), (iv), (v), (vi), or (vii); or

After the date ten (10) years before first becoming a director of the applicant, were employed by, or directors of, a person that received from the applicant more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in either the current year or the preceding year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 14, § 1.

19-14.8-10.
Certificate of registration — Timing.

The director shall approve or deny an initial registration as a provider within one hundred twenty (120) days after an application is filed. In connection with a request pursuant to this chapter for additional information, the director may extend the one hundred twenty-day (120) period for not more than sixty (60) days. Within seven (7) days after denying an application, the director, in a record, shall inform the applicant of the reasons for the denial.

If the director denies an application for registration as a provider or does not act on an application within the time prescribed in subsection (a), the applicant may appeal and request a hearing pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

Subject to this chapter, §

19-14.8-11(d)

, and §

19-14.8-34

, a registration as a provider is valid for one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-11.
Renewal of registration.

A provider must obtain a renewal of its registration annually.

An application for renewal of registration as a provider must be in a form prescribed by the director, signed under oath or certified under the penalties of perjury, and:

Be filed in accordance with §

19-14-22

;

Be accompanied by the fee established by chapter 14 of this title and the bond required by this chapter;

Contain the matter required for initial registration as a provider by this chapter and a financial statement, audited by an accountant licensed to conduct audits, for the applicant’s fiscal year immediately preceding the application;

Disclose any changes in the information contained in the applicant’s application for registration, or its immediately previous application for renewal, as applicable;

Supply evidence of insurance in an amount equal to the larger of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or the highest daily balance in the trust account required by this chapter during the six-month (6) period immediately preceding the application:

Against risks of dishonesty, fraud, theft, and other misconduct on the part of the applicant or a director, employee, or agent of the applicant;

Issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state and rated at least “A” by a nationally recognized rating organization;

With a deductible of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

Payable to the applicant, the individuals who have agreements with the applicant, and this state, as their interests may appear; and

Not subject to cancellation by the applicant without the approval of the director;

Disclose the total amount of money received by the applicant pursuant to plans during the preceding twelve (12) months from, or on behalf of, individuals who reside in this state and the total amount of money distributed to creditors of those individuals during that period;

Disclose, to the best of the applicant’s knowledge, the gross amount of money accumulated during the preceding twelve (12) months pursuant to plans by, or on behalf of, individuals who reside in this state and with whom the applicant has agreements; and

Provide any other information that the director reasonably requires to perform the director’s duties under this section.

Except for the information required by §

19-14.8-6(7)

, (14), and (17) and the addresses required by §

19-14.8-6(4)

, the director shall make the information in an application for renewal of registration as a provider available to the public.

If a registered provider files a timely and complete application for renewal of registration, the registration remains effective until the director, in a record, notifies the applicant of a denial and states the reasons for the denial.

If the director denies an application for renewal of registration as a provider, the applicant, within ten (10) days after receiving notice of the denial, may appeal and request a hearing pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42. Subject to §

19-14.8-34

, while the appeal is pending, the applicant shall continue to provide debt-management services to individuals with whom it has agreements. If the denial is affirmed, subject to the director’s order and §

19-14.8-34

, the applicant shall continue to provide debt-management services to individuals with whom it has agreements until, with the approval of the director, it transfers the agreements to another registered provider or returns to the individuals all unexpended money that is under the applicant’s control.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 106, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 125, § 4.

19-14.8-12.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 8, effective June 29, 2022; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 8, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14.8-13.
Bond required.

Except as otherwise provided in §

19-14.8-14

, a provider that is required to be registered under this chapter shall file a surety bond with the director, which must:

Be in effect during the period of registration and for two (2) years after the provider ceases providing debt-management services to individuals in this state; and

Run to this state for the benefit of this state and of individuals who reside in this state when they agree to receive debt-management services from the provider, as their interests may appear.

Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to §

19-14.8-32(f)

, a surety bond filed pursuant to subsection (a) must:

Be in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or other larger or smaller amount that the director determines is warranted by the financial condition and business experience of the provider, the history of the provider in performing debt-management services, the risk to individuals, and any other factor the director considers appropriate;

Be issued by a bonding, surety, or insurance company authorized to do business in this state and rated at least “A” by a nationally recognized rating organization; and

Have payment conditioned upon noncompliance of the provider or its agent with this chapter.

If the principal amount of a surety bond is reduced by payment of a claim or a judgment, the provider shall immediately notify the director and, within thirty (30) days after notice by the director, file a new or additional surety bond in an amount set by the director. The amount of the new or additional bond must be at least the amount of the bond immediately before payment of the claim or judgment. If for any reason a surety terminates a bond, the provider shall immediately file a new surety bond in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or other amount determined pursuant to subsection (b).

The director or an individual may obtain satisfaction out of the surety bond procured pursuant to this section if:

The director assesses expenses under §

19-14.8-32(b)(1)

, issues a final order under §

19-14.8-33(a)(2)

, or recovers a final judgment under §

19-14.8-33(a)(4)

or (a)(5) or (d); or

An individual recovers a final judgment pursuant to §

19-14.8-35(a)

, (b), or (c)(1), (c)(2), or (c)(4).

If claims against a surety bond exceed or are reasonably expected to exceed the amount of the bond, the director, on the initiative of the director or on petition of the surety, shall, unless the proceeds are adequate to pay all costs, judgments, and claims, distribute the proceeds in the following order:

To satisfaction of a final order or judgment under §

19-14.8-33(a)

(2), (a)(4), or (a)(5) or (d);

To final judgments recovered by individuals pursuant to §

19-14.8-35(a)

, (b), or (c)(1), (c)(2) or (c)(4), pro rata;

To claims of individuals established to the satisfaction of the director, pro rata; and

If a final order or judgment is issued under §

19-14.8-33(a)

, to the expenses charged pursuant to §

19-14.8-32(b)(1)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-14.
Bond required — Substitute.

Instead of the surety bond required by §

19-14.8-13

, a provider may deliver to the director, in the amount required by §

19-14.8-13

(b), and, except as otherwise provided in subsection (a)(2)(A) of this section, payable or available to this state and to individuals who reside in this state when they agree to receive debt-management services from the provider, as their interests may appear, if the provider or its agent does not comply with this chapter:

A certificate of insurance issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state and rated at least “A” by a nationally recognized rating organization, with no deductible; or

With the approval of the director:

An irrevocable letter of credit, issued or confirmed by a bank approved by the director, payable upon presentation of a certificate by the director stating that the provider or its agent has not complied with this chapter; or

Bonds or other obligations of the United States or guaranteed by the United States or bonds or other obligations of this state or a political subdivision of this state, to be deposited and maintained with a bank approved by the director for this purpose.

If a provider furnishes a substitute pursuant to subsection (a), the provisions of §

19-14.8-13(a)

, (c), (d), and (e) apply to the substitute.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-15.
Requirement of good faith.

A provider shall act in good faith in all matters under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-16.
Customer service.

A provider that is required to be registered under this chapter shall maintain a toll-free communication system, staffed at a level that reasonably permits an individual to speak to a certified counselor or customer-service representative, as appropriate, during ordinary business hours.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-17.
Prerequisites for providing debt-management services.

Before providing debt-management services, a registered provider shall give the individual an itemized list of goods and services and the charges for each. The list must be clear and conspicuous; be in a record the individual may keep whether or not the individual assents to an agreement; and describe the goods and services the provider offers:

Free of additional charge if the individual enters into an agreement;

For a charge if the individual does not enter into an agreement; and

For a charge if the individual enters into an agreement, using the following terminology, as applicable, and format:

A provider may not furnish debt-management services unless the provider, through the services of a certified counselor:

Provides the individual with reasonable education about the management of personal finance; (2) Has prepared a financial analysis; and (3) If the individual is to make regular, periodic payments: (A) Has prepared a plan for the individual; (B) Has made a determination, based on the provider’s analysis of the information provided by the individual and otherwise available to it, that the plan is suitable for the individual and the individual will be able to meet the payment obligations under the plan; and (C) Believes that each creditor of the individual listed as a participating creditor in the plan will accept payment of the individual’s debts as provided in the plan.

Before an individual assents to an agreement to engage in a plan, a provider shall:

Provide the individual with a copy of the analysis and plan required by subsection (b) in a record that identifies the provider and that the individual may keep whether or not the individual assents to the agreement; (2) Inform the individual of the availability, at the individual’s option, of assistance by a toll-free communication system or in person to discuss the financial analysis and plan required by subsection (b); and (3) With respect to all creditors identified by the individual or otherwise known by the provider to be creditors of the individual, provide the individual with a list of: (A) Creditors that the provider expects to participate in the plan and grant concessions; (B) Creditors that the provider expects to participate in the plan but not grant concessions; (C) Creditors that the provider expects not to participate in the plan; and (D) All other creditors.

Before an individual assents to an agreement to engage in a plan, the provider shall inform the individual, in a record that contains nothing else, that is given separately, and that the individual may keep whether or not the individual assents to the agreement:

Of the name and business address of the provider; (2) That plans are not suitable for all individuals and the individual may ask the provider about other ways, including bankruptcy, to deal with indebtedness; (3) That establishment of a plan may adversely affect the individual’s credit rating or credit scores; (4) That nonpayment of debt may lead creditors to increase finance and other charges or undertake collection activity, including litigation; (5) Unless it is not true, that the provider may receive compensation from the creditors of the individual; and (6) That, unless the individual is insolvent, if a creditor settles for less than the full amount of the debt, the plan may result in the creation of taxable income to the individual, even though the individual does not receive any money.

If a provider may receive payments from an individual’s creditors and the plan contemplates that the individual’s creditors will reduce finance charges or fees for late payment, default, or delinquency, the provider may comply with subsection (d) by providing the following disclosure, surrounded by black lines:

If a provider will not receive payments from an individual’s creditors and the plan contemplates that the individual’s creditors will reduce finance charges or fees for late payment, default, or delinquency, a provider may comply with subsection (d) by providing the following disclosure, surrounded by black lines:

If a plan contemplates that creditors will settle debts for less than the full principal amount of debt owed, a provider may comply with subsection (d) by providing the following disclosure, surrounded by black lines:

Set-up fee dollar amount of fee Monthly service fee dollar amount of fee or method of determining amount Settlement fee dollar amount of fee or method of determining amount Goods and services in addition to those provided in connection with a plan: (item) dollar amount or method of determining amount (item) dollar amount or method of determining amount.

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOU TO CONSIDER (1) Debt-management plans are not right for all individuals, and you may ask us to provide information about other ways, including bankruptcy, to deal with your debts. (2) Using a debt-management plan may hurt your credit rating or credit scores. (3) We may receive compensation for our services from your creditors. Name and business address of provider.

Click to view

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOU TO CONSIDER (1) Debt-management plans are not right for all individuals, and you may ask us to provide information about other ways, including bankruptcy, to deal with your debts. (2) Using a debt-management plan may hurt your credit rating or credit scores. Name and business address of provider.

Click to view

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOU TO CONSIDER (1) Our program is not right for all individuals, and you may ask us to provide information about bankruptcy and other ways to deal with your debts. (2) Nonpayment of your debts under our program may: hurt your credit rating or credit scores; lead your creditors to increase finance and other charges; and lead your creditors to undertake activity, including lawsuits, to collect the debts. (3) Reduction of debt under our program may result in taxable income to you, even though you will not actually receive any money. Name and business address of provider.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.

19-14.8-18.
Communication by electronic or other means.

In this section:

“Federal act” means the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., as amended.

“Consumer” means an individual who seeks or obtains goods or services that are used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

A provider may satisfy the requirements of §§

19-14.8-17

,

19-14.8-19

, or

19-14.8-27

by means of the internet or other electronic means if the provider obtains a consumer’s consent in the manner provided by § 101(c)(1) of the federal act.

The disclosures and materials required by §§

19-14.8-17

,

19-14.8-19

, and

19-14.8-27

shall be presented in a form that is capable of being accurately reproduced for later reference.

With respect to disclosure by means of an internet website, the disclosure of the information required by §

19-14.8-17(d)

must appear on one or more screens that:

Contain no other information; and

The individual must see before proceeding to assent to formation of a plan.

At the time of providing the materials and agreement required by §

19-14.8-17(c)

and (d), §

19-14.8-19

, and §

19-14.8-27

, a provider shall inform the individual that upon electronic, telephonic, or written request, it will send the individual a written copy of the materials, and shall comply with a request as provided in subsection (f).

If a provider is requested, before the expiration of ninety (90) days after a plan is completed or terminated, to send a written copy of the materials required by §

19-14.8-17(c)

and (d), §

19-14.8-19

, or §

19-14.8-27

, the provider shall send them at no charge within three (3) business days after the request, but the provider need not comply with a request more than once per calendar month or if it reasonably believes the request is made for purposes of harassment. If a request is made more than ninety (90) days after a plan is completed or terminated, the provider shall send within a reasonable time a written copy of the materials requested.

A provider that maintains an internet website shall disclose on the home page of its website or on a page that is clearly and conspicuously connected to the home page by a link that clearly reveals its contents:

Its name and all names under which it does business;

Its principal business address, telephone number, and electronic-mail address, if any; and

The names of its principal officers.

Subject to subsection (i), if a consumer who has consented to electronic communication in the manner provided by section 101 of the federal act withdraws consent as provided in the federal act, a provider may terminate its agreement with the consumer.

If a provider wishes to terminate an agreement with a consumer pursuant to subsection (h), it shall notify the consumer that it will terminate the agreement unless the consumer, within thirty (30) days after receiving the notification, consents to electronic communication in the manner provided in § 101(c) of the federal act. If the consumer consents, the provider may terminate the agreement only as permitted by §

19-14.8-19(a)(6)(G)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 3.